Tennessee, session 114, SB0888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-24-104(c)(4)(A), is amended by
deleting "two (2) weeks" and substituting "fifteen (15) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0888
002991
- 1 -